Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-203 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning with students entering ninth grade in the 2025-
2026 school year, all students enrolled in a public secondary school
in this state shall be assigned a grade level pursuant to the amount
of course credits earned in the following manner:
1. Zero (0) to six (6) earned credits: freshman or ninth
grade;
Req. No. 11092 Page 1

2. Seven (7) to twelve (12) earned credits: sophomore or tenth
grade;
3. Thirteen (13) to eighteen (18) earned credits: junior or
eleventh grade; and
4. Nineteen (19) earned credits or above: senior or twelfth
grade.
B. Students who do not earn enough credits by the end of a
given school year to advance to another category as outlined in
subsection A of this section, shall remain in the category of their
current earned credits and shall not advance to another grade level.
C. For students in grades nine through twelve, school districts
shall include the following on each report card intended for student
or family use:
1. The student's number of earned credits to date;
2. The student's grade level based on the number of earned
credits as outlined in subsection A of this section;
3. The amount and description of outstanding graduation
requirements needed for the student; and
4. The student's anticipated graduation date based on current
earned credits.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 11092 Page 2

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11092 SW 01/11/25




















Req. No. 11092 Page 3